Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1538
Several writs of execution; levy on real property; how made; preference.

In all cases when two or more executions shall be put into the hands of any sheriff or other officer, and it shall be necessary to levy on real estate to satisfy the same, and either of the judgment creditors in whose favor one or more of said executions is issued shall require the sheriff, or other officer, to make a separate levy to satisfy his execution or executions, it shall be the duty of the sheriff, or other officer, to levy said execution, or so many thereof as may be required, on separate parcels of real property of the judgment debtor or debtors, giving to the officer making the levy on behalf of the creditor whose execution may, by the provisions of this chapter, be entitled to a preference, the choice of such part of the real property of the judgment debtor or debtors, as will be sufficient to satisfy the same. In all cases where two or more executions, which are entitled to no preference over each other, are put into the hands of the same officer, it shall be the duty of the officer, when required, to levy the same on separate parcels of real property of the judgment debtor or debtors, when the same may be divided without material injury; and if the real property of said debtors will not be sufficient to satisfy all the executions chargeable thereon, such part of the same shall be levied on to satisfy each execution as will bear the same proportion in value to the whole as the amount due on the execution bears to the amount of all the executions chargeable thereon.

R.S.1867, Code § 505, p. 479;

R.S.1913, § 8084;

C.S.1922, § 9020;

C.S.1929, § 20-1538;

R.S.1943, § 25-1538.